Rhode Island, session 2026, HB7423.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 42-11 of the General Laws entitled "Department of Administration"
is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
42-11-10.2. Statewide wastewater capacity study.
(a) The administrative head of the division of statewide planning ("division"), shall within
available appropriations and in coordination with the department of administration, the department
of environmental management and the executive office of housing, conduct a statewide wastewater
capacity study.
(b) The study shall evaluate the capacity, flows, physical condition, regulatory compliance,
and vulnerability to natural hazards of publicly and privately owned wastewater infrastructure
throughout the state.
(c) In conducting the study, the division shall:
(1) Identify areas underserved by wastewater infrastructure;
(2) Identify existing and projected wastewater capacity limitations that constrain housing
production or economic development;
(3) Identify areas with excess wastewater capacity suitable for additional residential or
mixed-use development;
(4) Evaluate how wastewater infrastructure conditions affect housing affordability, density,
and location including assessment of the cumulative impact of adjacent developments and land use

applications; and
(5) Make recommendations for efficient and strategic investments in wastewater
infrastructure to support housing and economic development while protecting public health and the
environment.
(d) Not later than July 1, 2027, the division shall submit a written report of the findings and
recommendations to the governor and to the general assembly, including the house and senate
committees having jurisdiction over housing, municipal government, finance, and the environment.
(e) The administrative head of the division shall transmit the report to the state planning
council for consideration in updates to the state guide plan.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC003777
========
LC003777 - Page 2 of 3